Idaho, session 2026, S1315.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 13, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-1397, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-1397. MATERNITY PRICE TRANSPARENCY AND DISCLOSURE. (1) In addi-
tion to reporting compliance with the federal hospital price transparency
requirements of 45 CFR 180, every hospital licensed under this chapter
that provides labor and delivery services shall ensure that its con-
sumer-friendly price estimator portal displays a comprehensive quote for
a maternity episode of care. This quote shall be available on a single
dedicated page that is accessible by a single click from the portal's main
pricing index.
(2) Every hospital described by subsection (1) of this section shall
create and maintain a clearly labeled, single-click entry point page within
its publicly available price estimator tool for both a vaginal birth episode
of care and a cesarean birth episode of care.
(3) Each episode of care page required pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section shall display:
(a) An episode of care price, including an all-inclusive price or
itemized list of all standard services and fees for the applicable di-
agnosis-related group related to an uncomplicated labor and delivery,
whether vaginal, cesarean, or vaginal birth after cesarean, including
intake, room and board, delivery, antepartum care, postpartum care,
blood tests, and routine level I newborn care;
(b) Common additional charges, including an itemized price list that
includes fees for services such as epidural, anesthesia, episiotomy,
circumcision, vacuum extraction, forceps, and lactation consultation;
and
(c) A mandatory disclosure statement specifying that the numbers pro-
vided represent a price disclosure for an uncomplicated birth and can-
not predict additional costs associated with unforeseen complications.
(4) A hospital licensed in this state shall not enter into a contract
that prevents it from offering a discounted cash price for labor and delivery
health services below other contracted rates with either commercial or pub-
lic payers or that prevents the hospital from disclosing its discounted cash
price to patients. Any clause in an existing contract that violates this
subsection is void and unenforceable to the extent of the conflict.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.